Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.080

Payment of claims—Signing of warrants.

Moneys of such school districts shall be paid out only upon orders for warrants signed by the president, or a majority of the board of directors and countersigned by the secretary: PROVIDED, That when, in the judgment of the board of directors, the orders for warrants issued by the district monthly shall have reached such numbers that the signing of each warrant by the president personally imposes too great a task on the president, the board of directors, after auditing all payrolls and bills as provided by RCW 28A.330.090, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the president, authorizing said treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date, number, name and amount, and the funds on which said warrants shall be drawn; thereupon the secretary of said board shall be authorized to draw and sign said orders for warrants. Orders for warrants and warrant registers may be sent in an electronic format and using facsimile signatures as provided under chapter 39.62 RCW.

[ 2012 c 209 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 346; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.110. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 292 s 11; RRS s 4800. Formerly RCW 28A.59.110, 28.62.110.]